Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1352
Toxic chemicals; University of Nebraska conduct assessment.

The University of Nebraska shall conduct an assessment of the environmental and human health effects of toxic chemicals. The assessment shall include:

(1) An evaluation of adverse long-term environmental, ecological, and human health effects of the chemicals released during (a) the production of ethanol made from grain or seed treated with pesticide and (b) the storage of byproducts created by the production of ethanol made from grain or seed treated with pesticide; and

(2) An assessment of the effects of polluted ground water, soil, and air relating to any ethanol production facility.

Laws 2022, LB1068, § 3.